Tennessee, session 114, HB2125.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-204(a), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting:
(a)
(1) In order to expand driver education throughout the public schools of
this state and to promote safety on the highways, the department of education is
directed to promote and expand driver education and training courses throughout
the public schools of this state.
(2) The department of education, in collaboration with the department of
safety, shall develop guidelines for LEAs and public charter schools providing a
driver education and training course that includes:
(A) Safety tips for safe driving and sharing the road;
(B) Using the driver license manual developed by the department
of safety for instructional purposes; and
(C) The dangers of driving under the influence and distracted
driving.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2125
012182
- 1 -